Utah statutes.
20A-2-108.   Driver license registration form -- Transmittal of information.

(1)  The lieutenant governor and the Driver License Division shall design the driver license application and renewal forms to include the question "if you are not registered to vote where you live now, would you like to register to vote today?"

(2) (a)  The lieutenant governor and the Driver License Division shall design a motor voter registration form to be used in conjunction with driver license application and renewal forms.

(b)  Each driver license application and renewal form shall contain:

(i)  a place for the applicant to decline to register to vote;

(ii)  an eligibility statement in substantially the following form:

"I do swear (or affirm), subject to penalty of law for false statements, that the information contained in this form is true, and that I am a citizen of the United States and a resident of the state of Utah, residing at the above address.  I will be at least 18 years old and will have resided in Utah for 30 days immediately before the next election.

Signed and sworn

____________________________________________________

Voter's Signature

__________(month\day\year)";

(iii)  a citizenship affidavit in substantially the following form:

"CITIZENSHIP AFFIDAVIT

Name:

Name at birth, if different:

Place of birth:

Date of birth:

Date and place of naturalization (if applicable):

I hereby swear and affirm, under penalties for voting fraud set forth below, that I am a citizen and that to the best of my knowledge and belief the information above is true and correct.

____________________________

Signature of Applicant

In accordance with Section 20A-2-401, the penalty for willfully causing, procuring, or allowing yourself to be registered to vote if you know you are not entitled to register to vote is up to one year in jail and a fine of up to $2,500";

(iv)  a statement that if an applicant declines to register to vote, the fact that the applicant has declined to register will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes; and

(v)  a statement that if an applicant does register to vote, the office at which the applicant submits a voter registration application will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes.

(3)  Upon receipt of a voter registration form from an applicant, the county clerk or the clerk's designee shall:

(a)  review the voter registration form for completeness and accuracy; and

(b)  if the county clerk believes, based upon a review of the form, that a person may be seeking to register to vote who is not legally entitled to register to vote, refer the form to the county attorney for investigation and possible prosecution.



Amended by Chapter 219, 2004 General Session

